Washington statutes.
RCW 35.72.010

Contracts authorized for street projects.

The legislative authority of any city, town, or county may contract with owners of real estate for the construction or improvement of street projects which the owners elect to install as a result of ordinances that require the projects as a prerequisite to further property development.

[ 1983 c 126 s 1.]